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DI18Z-14

DTC Normal | Source Voltage Drop

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The SRSisequippedwithavoltage  -increasecircuit(DC -DC converter) inthe airbag sensorassemblyin
case the source voltage drops.
Whenthe battery voltage drops, thevoltage  -increase circuit (DC -DC converter) functionstoincreasethe

voltage of the SRS to normal voltage.
The diagnosis system malfunction display for this circuit is different from other circuits that is when the SRS
warning light remains lit up and the DTC is a normal code, source voltage drop is indicated.

Malfunction in this circuit is not recorded in the airbag sensor assembly, and the source voltage returns to
normal, the SRS warning light automatically goes off.

DTC No. Diagnosis

(Normal) Source voltage drop
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection.
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Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Remove the steering wheel pad. (See page SR-13)
Disconnect the connector of the front passenger airbag
assembly. (See page RS-25)

Disconnect the connectors of the seat belt pretensioner
RH and LH. (See page BO-212)

Disconnect the connectors of the airbag sensor assem-
bly. (See page RS-38)

Disconnect the connectors of the front airbag sensor RH
and LH. (See page RS-43)

CAUTION:
Store the steering wheel pad with the front surface facing
upward.
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2 | Check source voltage.

Airbag Sensor Assembly PREPARATION:
ON (@) Connectnegative ( -)terminal cabletothe battery.
DBB (b)  Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:

IG2 Operating electric system (defogger, wiper, headlight, heater
blower, etc.), measure the voltage between each of 1G2 and
ACC of sensor and body ground.

OK:

e Ho1299 Voltage: 10 - 14V

H01298

sor assembly, and check battery and charging

NG Check harness between battery and airbag sen-
system.

3 | Does SRS warning light turn OFF?

PREPARATION:
a) Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
b) Connect the steering wheel pad connector.

(
) ¢
() Connect the front passenger airbag assembly connector.
(
(

ON

d) Connectthe seat belt pretensioner connector RH and LH.
e) Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
(f)  Turn ignition switch ON.

CHECK:
ABozoe no12ae| Operate electric system (defogger, wiper, headlight, heater
blower, etc.) and check that SRS warning light goes off.

bleshooting for the DTC. If a normal code is out-

NO Check for DTCs. If aDTC is output, perform trou-
put, replace airbag sensor assembly.

YES

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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